California statutes. Penal Code
(h) Except as provided in subdivision (g) and in order to protect the confidentiality and privacy of database and data bank information, the Department of Justice and local public DNA laboratories shall not otherwise be compelled in a criminal or civil proceeding to provide any DNA profile or forensic identification database or data bank information or its computer database program software or structures to any person or party seeking such records or
 information whether by subpoena or discovery, or other procedural device or inquiry.

(i) (1) (A) Any person who knowingly uses an offender specimen, sample, or DNA profile collected pursuant to this chapter for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes, or for other than the identification of missing persons, or who knowingly discloses DNA or other forensic identification information developed pursuant to this section to an unauthorized individual or agency, for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes, or for the identification of missing persons, in violation of this chapter, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(B) Any person who, for the purpose of financial gain, knowingly uses a specimen,
 sample, or DNA profile collected pursuant to this chapter for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes or for the identification of missing persons or who, for the purpose of financial gain, knowingly discloses DNA or other forensic identification information developed pursuant to this section to an unauthorized individual or agency, for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes or for other than the identification of missing persons, in violation of this chapter, shall, in addition to the penalty provided in subparagraph (A), be punished by a criminal fine in an amount three times that of any financial gain received or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.

(2) (A) If any employee of the Department of Justice knowingly uses a specimen, sample, or DNA profile collected pursuant to this chapter for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes, or knowingly discloses
 DNA or other forensic identification information developed pursuant to this section to an unauthorized individual or agency, for other than criminal identification or exclusion purposes or for other than the identification of missing persons, in violation of this chapter, the department shall be liable in civil damages to the donor of the DNA identification information in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, plus attorney’s fees and costs. In the event of multiple disclosures, the total damages available to the donor of the DNA is limited to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) plus attorney’s fees and costs.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, this shall be the sole and exclusive remedy against the Department of Justice and its employees available to the donor of the DNA.

(ii) The Department of Justice employee disclosing DNA
 identification information in violation of this chapter shall be absolutely immune from civil liability under this or any other law.

(3) It is not a violation of this section for a law enforcement agency in its discretion to publicly disclose the fact of a DNA profile match, or the name of the person identified by the DNA match when this match is the basis of law enforcement’s investigation, arrest, or prosecution of a particular person, or the identification of a missing or abducted person.

(j) It is not a violation of this chapter to furnish DNA or other forensic identification information of the defendant to his or her defense counsel for criminal defense purposes in compliance with discovery.

(k) It is not a violation of this section for law enforcement to release DNA and other forensic identification information
 developed pursuant to this chapter to a jury or grand jury, or in a document filed with a court or administrative agency, or as part of a judicial or administrative proceeding, or for this information to become part of the public transcript or record of proceedings when, in the discretion of law enforcement, disclosure is necessary because the DNA information pertains to the basis for law enforcement’s identification, arrest, investigation, prosecution, or exclusion of a particular person related to the case.

(l) It is not a violation of this section to include information obtained from a file in a transcript or record of a judicial proceeding, or in any other public record when the inclusion of the information in the public record is authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law.

(m) It is not a violation of this section for the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice, or
 an organization retained as an agent of the Department of Justice, or a local public laboratory to use anonymous records or criminal history information obtained pursuant to this chapter for training, research, statistical analysis of populations, or quality assurance or quality control.

(n) The Department of Justice shall make public the methodology and procedures to be used in its DNA program prior to the commencement of DNA testing in its laboratories. The Department of Justice shall review and consider on an ongoing basis the findings and results of any peer review and validation studies submitted to the department by members of the relevant scientific community experienced in the use of DNA technology. This material shall be available to criminal defense counsel upon court order made pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2.

(o) In order to
 maintain the computer system security of the Department of Justice DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Program, the computer software and database structures used by the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice to implement this chapter are confidential.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 15.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.    Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

299.6.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the Department of Justice, in its sole discretion, from the sharing or disseminating of population database or data bank information, DNA profile or forensic identification database or data bank information, analytical data and results generated for forensic identification database and data bank purposes, or protocol and forensic DNA analysis methods and quality assurance or quality control procedures with any of the following:

(1) Federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies.

(2) Crime laboratories, whether public or private, that serve federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies that have been approved by the Department of Justice.

(3) The attorney general’s office of any state.

(4) Any state or federally authorized auditing agent or board that inspects or reviews the work of the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory for the purpose of ensuring that the laboratory meets ASCLD/LAB and FBI standards for accreditation and quality assurance standards necessary under this chapter and for the state’s participation in CODIS and other national or international crime-solving networks.

(5) Any third party that the Department of Justice deems necessary to assist the department’s crime laboratory with statistical analyses of population databases, or the analyses of forensic protocol, research methods, or quality control procedures, or to assist in the recovery or identification of human remains for humanitarian purposes, including identification of missing persons.

(b) The population databases and data banks of the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice may be made available to and searched by the FBI and any other agency participating in the FBI’s CODIS System or any other national or international law enforcement database or data bank system.

(c) The Department of Justice may provide portions of biological samples including blood specimens, saliva samples, and buccal swab samples collected pursuant to this chapter to local public law enforcement DNA laboratories for identification purposes provided that the privacy provisions of this section are followed by the local public law enforcement laboratory and if each of the following conditions is met:

(1) The procedures used by the local public DNA laboratory for the handling of specimens and samples and the disclosure of results are the same as those established by the Department of Justice pursuant to Sections 297, 298, and 299.5.

(2) The methodologies and procedures used by the local public DNA laboratory for DNA or forensic identification analysis are compatible with those used by the Department of Justice, or otherwise are determined by the Department of Justice to be valid and appropriate for identification purposes.

(3) Only tests of value to law enforcement for identification purposes are performed and a copy of the results of the analysis are sent to the Department of Justice.

(4) All provisions of this section concerning privacy and security are followed.

(5) The local public law enforcement DNA laboratory assumes all costs of securing the specimens and samples and provides appropriate tubes, labels, and materials necessary to secure the specimens and samples.

(d) Any local DNA laboratory that produces DNA profiles of known reference samples for inclusion within the permanent files of the state’s DNA Data Bank program shall follow the policies of the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

299.7.

The Department of Justice is authorized to dispose of unused specimens and samples, unused portions of specimens and samples, and expired specimens and samples in the normal course of business and in a reasonable manner as long as the disposal method is designed to protect the identity and origin of specimens and samples from disclosure to third persons who are not a part of law enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Construction and Severability [300. - 300.4.]

300.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit or abrogate any existing authority of law enforcement officers to take, maintain, store, and utilize DNA or forensic identification markers, blood specimens, buccal swab samples, saliva samples, or thumb or palm print impressions for identification purposes.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

300.1.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the authority of local law enforcement to maintain their own DNA-related databases or data banks, or to restrict the Department of Justice with respect to data banks and databases created by other statutory authority, including, but not limited to, databases related to fingerprints, firearms and other weapons, child abuse, domestic violence deaths, child deaths, driving offenses, missing persons, violent crime information as described in Title 12 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 4, and criminal justice statistics permitted by Section 13305.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of local or county coroners or their agents, in the course of their scientific investigation, to utilize genetic and DNA technology to inquire into and determine the circumstances, manner, and cause of death, or to employ or use outside laboratories, hospitals, or research institutions that utilize genetic and DNA technology.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

300.2.

Any requirement to provide saliva samples pursuant to this chapter shall be construed as a requirement to provide buccal swab samples as of the effective date of the act that added this section. However, the Department of Justice may retain and use previously collected saliva and other biological samples as part of its database and databank program and for quality control purposes in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

300.3.

The duties and requirements of the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority pursuant to this chapter shall commence on July 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

300.4.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 300.2 (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 696, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 387.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Of Crimes Against Religion and Conscience, and Other Offenses Against Good Morals [302. - 310.5.]

302.

(a) Every person who intentionally disturbs or disquiets any assemblage of people met for religious worship at a tax-exempt place of worship, by profane discourse, rude or indecent behavior, or by any unnecessary noise, either within the place where the meeting is held, or so near it as to disturb the order and solemnity of the meeting, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) A court may require performance of community service of not less than 50 hours and not exceeding 80 hours as an alternative to imprisonment or a fine.

(c) In addition to the penalty set forth in subdivision (a), a person who has suffered a previous conviction of a violation of this section or Section 403, shall be required to perform community service of not less than 120 hours and not exceeding 160 hours.

(d) The existence of any fact which would bring a person under subdivision (c) or (d) shall be alleged in the complaint, information, or indictment and either:

(1) Admitted by the defendant in open court.

(2) Found to be true by a jury trying the issue of guilt.

(3) Found to be true by the court where guilt is established by a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

(4) Found to be true by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(e) Upon conviction of any person under this section for disturbances of religious worship, the court may, in accordance with the performance of community service imposed under this section, consistent with public safety interests and with the victim’s consent, order the defendant to perform a portion of, or all of, the required community service at the place where the disturbance of religious worship occurred.

(f) The court may waive the mandatory minimum requirements for community service whenever it is in the interest of justice to do so. When a waiver is granted, the court shall state on the record all reasons supporting the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 401, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages, other than in the original package, to employ upon the premises where the alcoholic beverages are sold any person for the purpose of procuring or encouraging the purchase or sale of such beverages, or to pay any person a percentage or commission on the sale of such beverages for procuring or encouraging such purchase or sale. Violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1935, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

303a.

It shall be unlawful, in any place of business where alcoholic beverages are sold to be consumed upon the premises, for any person to loiter in or about said premises for the purpose of begging or soliciting any patron or customer of, or visitor in, such premises to purchase any alcoholic beverage for the one begging or soliciting. Violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1591.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

Every person, firm, or corporation which sells or gives or in any way furnishes to another person, who is in fact under the age of 21 years, any candy, cake, cookie, or chewing gum which contains alcohol in excess of 12 of 1 percent by weight, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 934, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

(a) (1) (A) (i) A person who knowingly or under circumstances in which it has knowledge, or should otherwise have grounds for knowledge, sells, gives, or in any way furnishes to another person who is under 21 years of age any tobacco, cigarette, cigarette papers, or blunt wraps, or any other preparation of tobacco, or any other instrument or paraphernalia that is designed for the smoking or ingestion of tobacco, tobacco products, or any controlled substance, is subject to either a criminal action for a misdemeanor or a civil action brought by a city attorney, a county counsel, or a district attorney, punishable by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense, five
 hundred dollars ($500) for the second offense, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the third offense.

(ii) A firm, corporation, business, retailer, or wholesaler that under the circumstances described in clause (i) sells, gives, or in any way furnishes to another person who is under 21 years of age a product specified in clause (i) is subject to either a criminal action for a misdemeanor or a civil action brought by a city attorney, a county counsel, or a district attorney, punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense,
 one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second offense, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any subsequent offense. 

(iii) This subparagraph does not apply to the sale, giving, or furnishing of any of the products specified in clause (i) to active duty military personnel who are 18 years of age or older. An identification card issued by the United States Armed Forces shall be used as proof of age for this purpose.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 1464 or any other law, 25 percent of each civil and criminal penalty collected pursuant to this subdivision
 shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney, whoever is responsible for bringing the successful action.

(C) Proof that a defendant, or their employee or agent, demanded, was shown, and reasonably relied upon evidence of majority shall be a defense to any action brought pursuant to this subdivision. Evidence of majority of a person is a facsimile of, or a reasonable likeness of, a document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator’s license, a registration certificate issued under the federal Military Selective Service Act (50 U.S.C. Sec. 3801 et seq.), or an identification card issued to a
 member of the Armed Forces.

(D) For purposes of this section, the person liable for selling or furnishing tobacco products to persons under 21 years of age by a tobacco vending machine shall be the person authorizing the installation or placement of the tobacco vending machine upon premises they manage or otherwise control and under circumstances in which they have knowledge, or should otherwise have grounds for knowledge, that the tobacco vending machine will be utilized by persons under 21 years of age.

(2) For purposes of this section, “blunt wraps” means cigar papers or cigar wrappers of all types that are designed for smoking or ingestion of tobacco products and contain less than 50 percent tobacco.

(b) A
 person, firm, or corporation that sells, or deals in tobacco or any preparation of tobacco, shall post conspicuously and keep so posted in their place of business at each point of purchase the notice required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22952 of the Business and Professions Code, and a person failing to do so shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of fifty dollars ($50) for the first offense, one hundred dollars ($100) for the second offense, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the third offense, and five hundred dollars ($500) for the fourth offense and each subsequent violation of this provision, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding 30 days.

(c) For purposes of determining the liability of persons, firms, or corporations controlling franchises or business operations in multiple locations for the
 second and subsequent violations of this section, each individual franchise or business location shall be deemed a separate entity.

(d) It is the Legislature’s intent to regulate the subject matter of this section. As a result, a city, county, or city and county shall not adopt any ordinance or regulation inconsistent with this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “tobacco products” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 2021)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

308.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, no person shall sell, offer for sale, distribute, or import any tobacco product commonly referred to as “bidis” or “beedies,” unless that tobacco product is sold, offered for sale, or intended to be sold in a business establishment that prohibits the presence of persons under 18 years of age on its premises.

(b) For purposes of this section, “bidis” or “beedies” means any of the following:

(1) A product containing tobacco that is wrapped in temburni leaf (diospyros melanoxylon) or tendu leaf (diospyros exculpra).

(2) A
 product that is marketed and sold as “bidis” or “beedies.”

(c) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is also subject to a civil action brought by the Attorney General, a city attorney, county counsel, or district attorney for an injunction and a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation. This subdivision does not affect any other remedies available for a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 265, Sec. 5.   (AB 2496)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

308.2.

(a) Every person who sells one or more cigarettes, other than in a sealed and properly labeled package, is guilty of an infraction. 

(b) “A sealed and properly labeled package,” as used in this section, means the original packaging or sanitary wrapping of the manufacturer or importer which conforms to federal labeling requirements, including the federal warning label.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1231, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

308.3.

(a) A person, firm, corporation, or business may not manufacture for sale, distribute, sell, or offer to sell any cigarette, except in a package containing at least 20 cigarettes. A person, firm, corporation, or business may not manufacture for sale, distribute, sell, or offer to sell any roll-your-own tobacco, except in a package containing at least 0.60 ounces of tobacco.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “cigarette” means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of, or contains any of, the following:

(1) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco.

(2) Tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product, that, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette.

(3) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in this subdivision.

(c) Any person, firm, corporation, or business that violates this section is liable for an infraction, or in an action brought by the Attorney General, a district attorney, a county counsel, or a city attorney for a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) for the first violation, five hundred dollars ($500) for the second violation, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent act constituting a violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 376, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

308.5.

(a) No person or business shall sell, lease, rent, or provide, or offer to sell, lease, rent, or otherwise offer to the public or to public establishments in this state, any video game intended for either private use or for use in a public establishment and intended primarily for use by any person under the age of 18 years, which contains, in its design and in the on-screen presentation of the video game, any paid commercial advertisement of alcoholic beverage or tobacco product containers or other forms of consumer packaging, particular brand names, trademarks, or copyrighted slogans of alcoholic beverages or tobacco products.

(b) As used in this section, “video game” means any electronic amusement device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor, or similar electronic circuitry and its own cathode ray tube, or is designed to be used with a television set or a monitor, that interacts with the user of the device.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

308b.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every person who knowingly delivers or causes to be delivered to any residence in this state any tobacco products unsolicited by any person residing therein is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) It is a defense to a violation of this section that the recipient of the tobacco products is personally known to the defendant at the time of the delivery.

(c) The distribution of unsolicited tobacco products to residences in violation of this section is a nuisance within the meaning of Section 3479 of the Civil Code.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any liability on any employee of the United States Postal Service for actions performed in the scope of his employment by the United States Postal Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1005.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

Any proprietor, keeper, manager, conductor, or person having the control of any house of prostitution, or any house or room resorted to for the purpose of prostitution, who shall admit or keep any minor of either sex therein; or any parent or guardian of any such minor, who shall admit or keep such minor, or sanction, or connive at the admission or keeping thereof, into, or in any such house, or room, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

(a) Any minor under 16 years of age who visits or attends any prizefight or place where any prizefight is advertised to take place, and any owner, lessee, or proprietor, or the agent of any owner, lessee, or proprietor of any place where any prizefight is advertised or represented to take place who admits any minor to a place where any prizefight is advertised or represented to take place or who admits, sells, or gives to any minor a ticket or other paper by which that minor may be admitted to a place where a prizefight is advertised to take place, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 25 days.

(b) Any minor under 16 years of age who visits or attends any cockfight or place where any cockfight is advertised to take place, and any owner, lessee, or proprietor, or the agent of any owner, lessee, or proprietor of any place where any cockfight is advertised or represented to take place who admits any minor to a place where any cockfight is advertised or represented to take place or who admits, sells, or gives to any minor a ticket or other paper by which that minor may be admitted to a place where a cockfight is advertised to take place, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 25 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 425)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

310.2.

(a) Any coach, trainer, or other person acting in an official or nonofficial capacity as an adult supervisor for an athletic team consisting of minors under the age of 18 who sells, gives, or otherwise furnishes to any member of that team a diuretic, diet pill, or laxative with the intent that it be consumed, injected, or administered for any nonmedical purpose such as loss of weight or altering the body in any way related to participation on the team or league, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a minor’s parent or guardian, or any person acting at the written direction of, or with the written consent of, the parent or guardian, if that person is in fact acting with that authority. Subdivision (a) does not apply to a physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 999, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

310.5.

(a) Any parent or guardian of a child who enters into an agreement on behalf of that child which is in violation of Section 1669.5 of the Civil Code, and any alleged perpetrator of an unlawful sex act upon that child who enters into such an agreement, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than six months, or by both such a fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(c) For purposes of this section, “unlawful sex act,” means a felony sex offense committed against a minor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   Effective November 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Obscene Matter [311. - 312.7.]

311.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Obscene matter” means matter, taken as a whole, that to the average person, applying contemporary statewide standards, appeals to the prurient interest, that, taken as a whole, depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way, and that, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.

(1) If it appears from the nature of the matter or the circumstances of its dissemination, distribution, or exhibition that it is designed for clearly defined deviant sexual groups, the appeal of the matter shall be
 judged with reference to its intended recipient group.

(2) In prosecutions under this chapter, if the circumstances of production, presentation, sale, dissemination, distribution, or publicity indicate that matter is being commercially exploited by the defendant for the sake of its prurient appeal, this evidence is probative with respect to the nature of the matter and may justify the conclusion that the matter lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.

(3) In determining whether the matter taken as a whole lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value in description or representation of those matters, the fact that the defendant knew that the matter depicts persons under 16 years of age engaged in sexual conduct, as defined in
 subdivision (c) of Section 311.4, is a factor that may be considered in making that determination.

(b) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(c) “Matter” means any book, magazine, newspaper, or other printed or written material, or any picture, drawing, photograph, motion picture, or other pictorial representation, or any statue or other figure, or any recording, transcription, or mechanical, chemical, or electrical reproduction, or any other article, equipment, machine, or material. “Matter” also means live or recorded telephone messages if
 transmitted, disseminated, or distributed as part of a commercial transaction.

(d) “Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(e) “Distribute” means transfer possession of, whether with or without consideration.

(f) “Knowingly” means being aware of the character of the matter or live conduct.

(g) “Exhibit” means show.

(h) “Obscene live conduct” means any physical human body
 activity, whether performed or engaged in alone or with other persons, including, but not limited to, singing, speaking, dancing, acting, simulating, or pantomiming, taken as a whole, that to the average person, applying contemporary statewide standards, appeals to the prurient interest and is conduct that, taken as a whole, depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way and that, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.

(1) If it appears from the nature of the conduct or the circumstances of its production, presentation, or exhibition that it is designed for clearly defined deviant sexual groups, the appeal of the conduct shall be judged with reference to its intended recipient group.

(2) In
 prosecutions under this chapter, if circumstances of production, presentation, advertising, or exhibition indicate that live conduct is being commercially exploited by the defendant for the sake of its prurient appeal, that evidence is probative with respect to the nature of the conduct and may justify the conclusion that the conduct lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.

(3) In determining whether the live conduct taken as a whole lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value in description or representation of those matters, the fact that the defendant knew that the live conduct depicts persons under 16 years of age engaged in sexual conduct, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 311.4, is a factor that may be considered in making that determination.

(i) The Legislature expresses its approval of the holding of People v. Cantrell, 7 Cal. App. 4th 523, that, for the purposes of this chapter, matter that “depicts a person under 18 years of age personally engaging in or personally simulating sexual conduct” is limited to visual works that depict that conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 926, Sec. 2.   (AB 1831)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

311.1.

(a) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disc, data storage media, CD-ROM, or computer-generated equipment or any other computer-generated image that contains or incorporates in any manner, any film, filmstrip, or any digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated matter, with intent to distribute or to exhibit to, or to exchange with, others, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to, or exchanges
 with, others, any obscene matter, knowing that the matter depicts a person under 18 years of age, or contains digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated data depicting what appears to be a person under 18 years of age, engaging in or simulating sexual conduct, as defined in Section 311.4, shall be punished either by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in the state prison, by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by the fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section does not apply to the activities of law enforcement and prosecuting agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses or to legitimate medical, scientific, or educational activities, or to lawful conduct between spouses.

(c) This section does not apply to
 matter that depicts a child under 18 years of age when the child is legally emancipated, including lawful conduct between spouses when one or both are under 18 years of age.

(d) It does not constitute a violation of this section for a telephone corporation, as defined by Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code, to carry or transmit messages described in this chapter or perform related activities in providing telephone services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

311.2.

(a) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, or prints, with intent to distribute or to exhibit to others, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to others, any obscene matter is for a first offense, guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person has previously been convicted of any violation of this section, the court may, in addition to the punishment authorized in Section 311.9, impose a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(b) Every person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or causes to be
 brought, into this state for sale or distribution, or in this state possesses, prepares, publishes, produces, develops, duplicates, or prints any representation of information, data, or image, including, but not limited to, any film, filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disc, data storage media, CD-ROM, or computer-generated equipment or any other computer-generated image that contains or incorporates in any manner, any film, filmstrip, or any digitally altered or artificial-intelligence-generated matter, with intent to distribute or to exhibit to, or to exchange with, others for commercial consideration, or who offers to distribute, distributes, or exhibits to, or exchanges with, others for commercial consideration, any obscene matter, knowing that the matter depicts a person under 18 years of age